Louisiana, session 2026, SB360.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:353(B)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§353. Louisiana's pathway to independency workforce training and education pilot
initiative; creation; advisory board; functions
* * *
B.(1) The program shall initially operate and serve participants in the
following parishes:
* * *
(2) The geographic service area of the initiative may be expanded beyond the
parishes specified in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection after upon the conclusion of
an evaluation utilizing performance outcome driven data and information regarding
participant experience. The state partners and advisory board may work with the
local human service districts and authorities for assistance with expansion of the
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-600 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 360
initiative.
* * *